District of Columbia statutes.
11-1502

Tenure.

Subject to mandatory retirement at age 74 and to the provisions of subchapters II and III of this chapter, a judge of a District of Columbia court appointed on or after the date of enactment of the District of Columbia Court Reorganization Act of 1970 shall serve for a term of fifteen years, and upon completion of such term, such judge shall continue to serve until the judge’s successor is appointed and qualifies.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 491, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Mar. 19, 1984, 98 Stat. 65, Pub. L. 98-235
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(20), 108 Stat. 713

Cross References

District Charter provisions relating to tenure of judges, see § 1-204.31.
Eligibility for retirement after ten years of service, see § 11-1562.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 11-1562.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-1502.
1973 Ed., § 11-1502.

References in Text

The date of enactment of the District of Columbia Court Reorganization Act of 1970, referred to in this section, is July 29, 1970.